Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Chapter 11. Implied Consent Law
§ 63-11-30.
Operating a
vehicle while under influence of alcohol or other drugs; penalties; zero tolerance for minors; DUI test refusal; aggravated DUI; DUI child endangerment; expunction; nonadjudication.

It is unlawful for a person to drive or otherwise operate a vehicle within this state if the person:

Is under the influence of intoxicating liquor;

Is under the influence of any other substance that has impaired the person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle;

Is under the influence of any drug or controlled substance, the possession of which is unlawful under the Mississippi Controlled Substances Law; or

Has an alcohol concentration in the person’s blood, based upon grams of alcohol per one hundred (100) milliliters of blood, or grams of alcohol per two hundred ten (210) liters of breath, as shown by a chemical analysis of the person’s breath, blood or urine administered as authorized by this chapter, of:

Eight one-hundredths percent (.08%) or more for a person who is above the legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages under state law;

Two one-hundredths percent (.02%) or more for a person who is below the legal age to purchase alcoholic beverages under state law; or

Four one-hundredths percent (.04%) or more for a person operating a commercial motor vehicle.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this section (Zero Tolerance for Minors):

First offense DUI.

Upon conviction of any person for the first offense of violating subsection (1) of this section where chemical tests under Section 63-11-5 were given, or where chemical test results are not available, the person shall be fined not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or imprisoned for not more than forty-eight (48) hours in jail, or both; the court shall order the person to attend and complete an alcohol safety education program as provided in Section 63-11-32 within six (6) months of sentencing. The court may substitute attendance at a victim impact panel instead of forty-eight (48) hours in jail.

Suspension of commercial driving privileges is governed by Section 63-1-216.

A qualifying first offense may be nonadjudicated by the court under subsection (14) of this section. The holder of a commercial driver’s license or a commercial learning permit at the time of the offense is ineligible for nonadjudication.

Eligibility for an interlock-restricted license is governed by Section 63-11-31 and suspension of regular driving privileges is governed by Section 63-11-23.

Second offense DUI.

Upon any second conviction of any person violating subsection (1) of this section, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, fined not less than Six Hundred Dollars ($600.00) nor more than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00), shall be imprisoned not less than five (5) days nor more than six (6) months and sentenced to community service work for not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months. The minimum penalties shall not be suspended or reduced by the court and no prosecutor shall offer any suspension or sentence reduction as part of a plea bargain.

Suspension of commercial driving privileges is governed by Section 63-1-216.

Eligibility for an interlock-restricted license is governed by Section 63-11-31 and suspension of regular driving privileges is governed by Section 63-11-23.

Third offense DUI.

For a third conviction of a person for violating subsection (1) of this section, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, the person shall be guilty of a felony and fined not less than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), and shall serve not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections. For any offense that does not result in serious injury or death to any person, the sentence of incarceration may be served in the county jail rather than in the State Penitentiary at the discretion of the circuit court judge. The minimum penalties shall not be suspended or reduced by the court and no prosecutor shall offer any suspension or sentence reduction as part of a plea bargain.

The suspension of commercial driving privileges is governed by Section 63-1-216.

The suspension of regular driving privileges is governed by Section 63-11-23.

Fourth and subsequent offense DUI.

For any fourth or subsequent conviction of a violation of subsection (1) of this section, without regard to the time period within which the violations occurred, the person shall be guilty of a felony and fined not less than Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) nor more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), and shall serve not less than two (2) years nor more than ten (10) years in the custody of the Department of Corrections.

The suspension of commercial driving privileges is governed by Section 63-1-216.

A person convicted of a fourth or subsequent offense is ineligible to exercise the privilege to operate a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition-interlock device for ten (10) years.

Any person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this section shall receive an in-depth diagnostic assessment, and if as a result of the assessment is determined to be in need of treatment for alcohol or drug abuse, the person must successfully complete treatment at a program site certified by the Department of Mental Health. Each person who receives a diagnostic assessment shall pay a fee representing the cost of the assessment. Each person who participates in a treatment program shall pay a fee representing the cost of treatment.

The use of ignition-interlock devices is governed by Section 63-11-31.

Zero Tolerance for Minors.

This subsection shall be known and may be cited as Zero Tolerance for Minors. The provisions of this subsection shall apply only when a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years has a blood alcohol concentration of two one-hundredths percent (.02%) or more, but lower than eight one-hundredths percent (.08%). If the person’s blood alcohol concentration is eight one-hundredths percent (.08%) or more, the provisions of subsection (2) shall apply.

(i) A person under the age of twenty-one (21) is eligible for nonadjudication of a qualifying first offense by the court pursuant to subsection (14) of this section.

Upon conviction of any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years for the first offense of violating subsection (1) of this section where chemical tests provided for under Section 63-11-5 were given, or where chemical test results are not available, the person shall be fined Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00); the court shall order the person to attend and complete an alcohol safety education program as provided in Section 63-11-32 within six (6) months. The court may also require attendance at a victim impact panel.

A person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who is convicted of a second violation of subsection (1) of this section, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, shall be fined not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00).

A person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who is convicted of a third or subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this section, the offenses being committed within a period of five (5) years, shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00).

License suspension is governed by Section 63-11-23 and ignition interlock is governed by Section 63-11-31.

Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years convicted of a third or subsequent violation of subsection (1) of this section must complete treatment of an alcohol or drug abuse program at a site certified by the Department of Mental Health.

DUI test refusal.In addition to the other penalties provided in this section, every person refusing a law enforcement officer’s request to submit to a chemical test of the person’s breath as provided in this chapter, or who was unconscious at the time of a chemical test and refused to consent to the introduction of the results of the test in any prosecution, shall suffer an additional administrative suspension of driving privileges as set forth in Section 63-11-23.

Aggravated DUI.

Every person who operates any motor vehicle in violation of the provisions of subsection (1) of this section and who in a negligent manner causes the death of another or mutilates, disfigures, permanently disables or destroys the tongue, eye, lip, nose or any other limb, organ or member of another shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a separate felony for each victim who suffers death, mutilation, disfigurement or other injury and shall be committed to the custody of the State Department of Corrections for a period of time of not less than five (5) years and not to exceed twenty-five (25) years for each death, mutilation, disfigurement or other injury, and the imprisonment for the second or each subsequent conviction, in the discretion of the court, shall commence either at the termination of the imprisonment for the preceding conviction or run concurrently with the preceding conviction. Any person charged with causing the death of another as described in this subsection shall be required to post bail before being released after arrest.

A holder of a commercial driver’s license who is convicted of operating a commercial motor vehicle with an alcohol concentration of eight one-hundreths percent (.08%) or more shall be guilty of a felony and shall be committed to the custody of the Department of Corrections for not less than two (2) years and not more than ten (10) years.

The court shall order an ignition-interlock restriction on the offender’s privilege to drive as a condition of probation or post-release supervision not to exceed five (5) years unless a longer restriction is required under other law. The ignition-interlock restriction shall not be applied to commercial license privileges until the driver serves the full disqualification period required by Section 63-1-216.

DUI citations.

Upon conviction of a violation of subsection (1) of this section, the trial judge shall sign in the place provided on the traffic ticket, citation or affidavit stating that the person arrested either employed an attorney or waived his right to an attorney after having been properly advised. If the person arrested employed an attorney, the name, address and telephone number of the attorney shall be written on the ticket, citation or affidavit. The court clerk must immediately send a copy of the traffic ticket, citation or affidavit, and any other pertinent documents concerning the conviction or other order of the court, to the Department of Public Safety as provided in Section 63-11-37.

A copy of the traffic ticket, citation or affidavit and any other pertinent documents, having been attested as true and correct by the Commissioner of Public Safety, or his designee, shall be sufficient proof of the conviction for purposes of determining the enhanced penalty for any subsequent convictions of violations of subsection (1) of this section. The Department of Public Safety shall maintain a central database for verification of prior offenses and convictions.

Out-of-state prior convictions.Convictions in another state, territory or possession of the United States, or under the law of a federally recognized Native American tribe, of violations for driving or operating a vehicle while under the influence of an intoxicating liquor or while under the influence of any other substance that has impaired the person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle occurring within five (5) years before an offense shall be counted for the purposes of determining if a violation of subsection (1) of this section is a second, third, fourth or subsequent offense and the penalty that shall be imposed upon conviction for a violation of subsection (1) of this section.

Charging of subsequent offenses.

For the purposes of determining how to impose the sentence for a second, third, fourth or subsequent conviction under this section, the affidavit or indictment shall not be required to enumerate previous convictions. It shall only be necessary that the affidavit or indictment states the number of times that the defendant has been convicted and sentenced within the past five (5) years for a second or third offense, or without a time limitation for a fourth or subsequent offense, under this section to determine if an enhanced penalty shall be imposed. The amount of fine and imprisonment imposed in previous convictions shall not be considered in calculating offenses to determine a second, third, fourth or subsequent offense of this section.

Before a defendant enters a plea of guilty to an offense under this section, law enforcement must submit certification to the prosecutor that the defendant’s driving record, the confidential registry and National Crime Information Center record have been searched for all prior convictions, nonadjudications, pretrial diversions and arrests for driving or operating a vehicle while under the influence of an intoxicating liquor or while under the influence of any other substance that has impaired the person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle. The results of the search must be included in the certification.

License eligibility for underage offenders.A person who is under the legal age to obtain a license to operate a motor vehicle at the time of the offense and who is convicted under this section shall not be eligible to receive a driver’s license until the person reaches the age of eighteen (18) years.

License suspensions and restrictions to run consecutively.Suspension or restriction of driving privileges for any person convicted of or nonadjudicated for violations of subsection (1) of this section shall run consecutively to and not concurrently with any other administrative license suspension.

Ignition interlock.If the court orders installation and use of an ignition-interlock device as provided in Section 63-11-31 for every vehicle operated by a person convicted or nonadjudicated under this section, each device shall be installed, maintained and removed as provided in Section 63-11-31.

DUI child endangerment.A person over the age of twenty-one (21) who violates subsection (1) of this section while transporting in a motor vehicle a child under the age of sixteen (16) years is guilty of the separate offense of endangering a child by driving under the influence of alcohol or any other substance which has impaired the person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle. The offense of endangering a child by driving under the influence of alcohol or any other substance which has impaired the person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle shall not be merged with an offense of violating subsection (1) of this section for the purposes of prosecution and sentencing. An offender who is convicted of a violation of this subsection shall be punished as follows:

A person who commits a violation of this subsection which does not result in the serious injury or death of a child and which is a first conviction shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or shall be imprisoned for not more than twelve (12) months, or both;

A person who commits a violation of this subsection which does not result in the serious injury or death of a child and which is a second conviction shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or shall be imprisoned for one (1) year, or both;

A person who commits a violation of this subsection which does not result in the serious injury or death of a child and which is a third or subsequent conviction shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or shall be imprisoned for not less than one (1) year nor more than five (5) years, or both; and

A person who commits a violation of this subsection which results in the serious injury or death of a child, without regard to whether the offense was a first, second, third or subsequent offense, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) and shall be imprisoned for not less than five (5) years nor more than twenty-five (25) years.

Expunction.

Any person convictedunder subsection (2) or (3) of this section of a first offense ofdriving under the influence and who was not the holder of a commercialdriver’s license or a commercial learning permit at the timeof the offense may petition the circuit court of the county in whichthe conviction was had for an order to expunge the record of the convictionat least five (5) years after successful completion of all terms andconditions of the sentence imposed for the conviction. Expunctionunder this subsection will only be available to a person:

Who has successfullycompleted all terms and conditions of the sentence imposed for theconviction;

Who did not refuseto submit to a test of his blood or breath;

Whose blood alcoholconcentration tested below sixteen one-hundredths percent (.16%) iftest results are available;

Who has not beenconvicted of and does not have pending any other offense of drivingunder the influence;

Who has providedthe court with justification as to why the conviction should beexpunged; and

Who has not previouslyhad a nonadjudication or expunction of a violation of this section.

A person is eligible for only one (1) expunction under this subsection, and the Department of Public Safety shall maintain a permanent confidential registry of all cases of expunction under this subsection for the sole purpose of determining a person’s eligibility for expunction, for nonadjudication, or as a first offender under this section.

The court in its order of expunction shall state in writing the justification for which the expunction was granted and forward the order to the Department of Public Safety within five (5) days of the entry of the order.

Nonadjudication.

For the purposes of this chapter, “nonadjudication” means that the court withholds adjudication of guilt and sentencing, either at the conclusion of a trial on the merits or upon the entry of a plea of guilt by a defendant, and places the defendant in a nonadjudication program conditioned upon the successful completion of the requirements imposed by the court under this subsection.

A person is eligible for nonadjudication of an offense under this Section 63-11-30 only one (1) time under any provision of a law that authorizes nonadjudication and only for an offender:

Who has successfully completed all terms and conditions imposed by the court after placement of the defendant in a nonadjudication program;

Who was not the holder of a commercial driver’s license or a commercial learning permit at the time of the offense;

Who has not previously been convicted of and does not have pending any former or subsequent charges under this section; and

Who has provided the court with justification as to why nonadjudication is appropriate.

Nonadjudication may be initiated upon the filing of a petition for nonadjudication or at any stage of the proceedings in the discretion of the court; the court may withhold adjudication of guilt, defer sentencing, and upon the agreement of the offender to participate in a nonadjudication program, enter an order imposing requirements on the offender for a period of court supervision before the order of nonadjudication is entered. Failure to successfully complete a nonadjudication program subjects the person to adjudication of the charges against him and to imposition of all penalties previously withheld due to entrance into a nonadjudication program. The court shall immediately inform the commissioner of the conviction as required in Section 63-11-37.

1. Pay the nonadjudication fee imposed under Section 63-11-31 if applicable;

2. Pay all fines, penalties and assessments that would have been imposed for conviction;

3. Attend and complete an alcohol safety education program as provided in Section 63-11-32 within six (6) months of the date of the order;

4. a. If the court determines that the person violated this section with respect to alcohol or intoxicating liquor, the person must install an ignition-interlock device on every motor vehicle operated by the person, obtain an interlock-restricted license, and maintain that license for one hundred twenty (120) days or suffer a one-hundred-twenty-day suspension of the person’s regular driver’s license, during which time the person must not operate any vehicle.

b. If the court determines that the person violated this section by operating a vehicle when under the influence of a substance other than alcohol that has impaired the person’s ability to operate a motor vehicle, including any drug or controlled substance which is unlawful to possess under the Mississippi Controlled Substances Law, the person must submit to a one-hundred-twenty-day period of a nonadjudication program that includes court-ordered drug testing at the person’s own expense not less often than every thirty (30) days, during which time the person may drive if compliant with the terms of the program, or suffer a one-hundred-twenty-day suspension of the person’s regular driver’s license, during which time the person will not operate any vehicle.

The court shall order the person to:

Other conditions that may be imposed by the court include, but are not limited to, alcohol or drug screening, or both, proof that the person has not committed any other traffic violations while under court supervision, proof of immobilization or impoundment of vehicles owned by the offender if required, and attendance at a victim-impact panel.

The court may enter an order of nonadjudication only if the court finds, after a hearing or after ex parte examination of reliable documentation of compliance, that the offender has successfully completed all conditions imposed by law and previous orders of the court. The court shall retain jurisdiction over cases involving nonadjudication for a period of not more than two (2) years.

(i) The clerk shall immediately forward a record of every person placed in a nonadjudication program and of every nonadjudication order to the Department of Public Safety for inclusion in the permanent confidential registry of all cases that are nonadjudicated under this subsection (14).

Judges, clerks and prosecutors involved in the trial of implied consent violations and law enforcement officers involved in the issuance of citations for implied consent violations shall have secure online access to the confidential registry for the purpose of determining whether a person has previously been the subject of a nonadjudicated case and 1. is therefore ineligible for another nonadjudication; 2. is ineligible as a first offender for a violation of this section; or 3. is ineligible for expunction of a conviction of a violation of this section.

The Driver Services Bureau of the department shall have access to the confidential registry for the purpose of determining whether a person is eligible for a form of license not restricted to operating a vehicle equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

The Mississippi Alcohol Safety Education Program shall have secure online access to the confidential registry for research purposes only.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 491, § 6; Laws, 1983, ch. 466, §§ 7, 13; Laws, 1989, ch. 565, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 480, § 6; Laws, 1992, ch. 500, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 340, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 527, § 11; Laws, 1998, ch. 505, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 542, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 367, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 503, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 438, § 1; Laws of 2012, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 478, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 428, § 1, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2017.

§ 63-11-31.
Interlock restricted license; ignition interlock device; impoundment or immobilization of vehicles; use of Interlock Device Fund to offset cost of device installation and operation by indigent offenders; reinstatement of license without interlock restriction.

[Effective until July 1, 2020, this section will read as follows:]

The provisions of this section are supplemental to the provisions of Section 63-11-30.

(i) “Ignition-interlock device” means a device approved by the Department of Public Safety that connects a motor vehicle ignition system to a breath-alcohol analyzer and prevents a motor vehicle ignition from starting if the driver’s blood alcohol level exceeds the calibrated setting on the device.

“Interlock-restricted license” means a driver’s license bearing a restriction that limits the person to operation of vehicles equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

A person who can exercise the privilege of driving only under an interlock-restricted license must have an ignition-interlock device installed and operating on all motor vehicles owned or operated by the person.

A person who installs an ignition-interlock device may obtain an interlock-restricted license.

The cost of installation and operation of an ignition-interlock device shall be borne by the person to whom an interlock-restricted driver’s license is issued, and the costs of court-ordered drug testing shall be borne by the person so ordered, unless the person is determined by the court to be indigent.

(i) A person convicted under Section 63-11-30 shall be assessed by the court, in addition to the criminal fines, penalties and assessments provided by law for violations of Section 63-11-30, a fee of Fifty Dollars ($50.00), to be deposited in the Interlock Device Fund in the State Treasury unless the person is determined by the court to be indigent.

A person nonadjudicated under Section 63-11-30 shall be assessed by the court, in addition to the criminal fines, penalties and assessments provided by law for violations of Section 63-11-30, a fee of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) to be deposited in the Interlock Device Fund in the State Treasury unless the person is determined by the court to be indigent.

The Department of Public Safety shall promulgate rules and regulations for the use of an ignition-interlock device. The Department of Public Safety shall approve which vendors shall be used to furnish the systems, may assess fees to the vendors, and shall prescribe the maximum costs to the offender for installation, removal, monthly operation, periodic inspections, calibrations and repairs.

A person who has an ignition-interlock device installed in a vehicle shall:

Provide proof of the installation of the device and periodic reporting for verification of the proper operation of the device;

Have the system monitored for proper use and accuracy as required by departmental regulation;

Pay the reasonable cost of leasing or buying, monitoring, and maintaining the device unless the person is determined to be indigent; and

Obtain an ignition-interlock driver’s license.

(i) A person who is limited to driving only under an interlock-restricted driver’s license shall not operate a vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

A person prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition-interlock device may not solicit or have another person attempt to start or start a motor vehicle equipped with such a device.

A person may not start or attempt to start a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition-interlock device for the purpose of providing an operable motor vehicle to a person who is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle that is not equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

A person may not tamper with, or in any way attempt to circumvent, the operation of an ignition-interlock device that has been installed in a motor vehicle.

A person may not knowingly provide a motor vehicle not equipped with a functioning ignition-interlock device to another person who the provider of the vehicle knows or should know is prohibited from operating a motor vehicle not equipped with an ignition-interlock device.

A violation of this subsection (4) is a misdemeanor and upon conviction the violator shall be fined an amount not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both, unless the starting of a motor vehicle equipped with an ignition-interlock device is done for the purpose of safety or mechanical repair of the device or the vehicle, and the person subject to the restriction does not operate the vehicle.

In order to obtain an interlock-restricted license, a person must:

Be otherwise qualified to operate a motor vehicle, and will be subject to all other restrictions on the privilege to drive provided by law;

Submit proof that an ignition-interlock device is installed and operating on all motor vehicles operated by the person; and

Pay the fee set forth in Section 63-1-43 to obtain the license without regard to indigence; no license reinstatement fee under Section 63-1-46 shall be charged for a person obtaining an interlock-restricted license.

In addition to the penalties authorized for any second or subsequent conviction under Section 63-11-30, the court shall order that all vehicles owned by the offender that are not equipped with an ignition-interlock device must be either impounded or immobilized pending further order of the court lifting the offender’s driving restriction. However, no county, municipality, sheriff’s department or the Department of Public Safety shall be required to keep, store, maintain, serve as a bailee or otherwise exercise custody over a motor vehicle impounded under the provisions of this section. The cost associated with any impoundment or immobilization shall be paid by the person convicted without regard to ability to pay.

A person may not tamper with, or in any way attempt to circumvent, vehicle immobilization or impoundment ordered by the court under this section. A violation of this paragraph (b) is a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, the violator shall be fined an amount not less than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both.

The Department of Public Safety shall promulgate rules and regulations for the use of monies in the Interlock Device Fund to offset the cost of device installation and operation by and court-ordered drug testing of indigent offenders.

The court shall determine a defendant’s indigence based upon whether the defendant has access to adequate resources to pay the ignition-interlock fee and the costs of installation and maintenance of an ignition-interlock device, or the costs of court-ordered drug testing or both, and may further base the determination of indigence on proof of enrollment in one or more of the following types of public assistance:

Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF);

Medicaid assistance;

The Supplemental Nutritional Assistance Program (SNAP), also known as “food stamps”;

Supplemental security income (SSI);

Participation in a federal food distribution program;

Federal housing assistance;

Unemployment compensation; or

Other criteria determined appropriate by the court.

No more than ten percent (10%) of the money in the Interlock Device Fund in any fiscal year shall be expended by the department for the purpose of administering the fund.

(i) Money in the Interlock Device Fund will be appropriated to the department to cover part of the costs of installing, removing and leasing ignition-interlock devices for indigent people who are required, because of a conviction or nonadjudication under Section 63-11-30, to install an ignition-interlock device in all vehicles operated by the person.

If money is available in the Interlock Device Fund, the department shall pay to the vendor, for one (1) vehicle per offender, up to Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for the cost of installation, up to Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for the cost of removal, and up to Thirty Dollars ($30.00) monthly for verified active usage of the ignition-interlock device. The department shall not pay any amount above what an offender would be required to pay for the installation, removal or usage of an ignition-interlock device.

In order to reinstate a form of driver’s license that is not restricted to operation of an ignition-interlock equipped vehicle, the person must submit proof to the Department of Public Safety to substantiate the person’s eligibility for an unrestricted license, which may be a court order indicating completion of sentence or final order of nonadjudication; in the absence of a court order, the proof may consist of the following or such other proof as the commissioner may set forth by regulation duly adopted under the Administrative Procedures Act:

Proof of successful completion of an alcohol safety program as provided in Section 63-11-32 if so ordered by the court;

Payment of the reinstatement fee required under Section 63-1-46(1)(a);

Payment of the driver’s license fee required under Section 63-1-43;

A certificate of liability insurance or proof of financial responsibility; and

(i) For those driving under an interlock-restricted license, a declaration from the vendor, in a form provided or approved by the Department of Public Safety, certifying that there have been none of the following incidents in the last thirty (30) days:

1. An attempt to start the vehicle with a breath alcohol concentration of 0.04 or more;

2. Failure to take or pass any required retest; or

3. Failure of the person to appear at the ignition-interlock device vendor when required for maintenance, repair, calibration, monitoring, inspection, or replacement of the device; or

For a person who violated Section 63-11-30 with respect to drugs other than alcohol, proof of successful compliance with all court-ordered drug testing; or

Both subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph (e) if applicable.

The court may extend the interlock-restricted period if the person had a violation in the last thirty (30) days.

The court that originally ordered installation of the ignition-interlock device for a violation of Section 63-11-30 and a court in the municipality or county in which the violation occurred have jurisdiction over an offense under this section.

A person who voluntarily obtains an interlock-restricted license may convert at any time to any other form of license for which the person is qualified.

The Department of Public Safety shall require all manufacturers of ignition-interlock devices to report ignition-interlock data in a consistent and uniform format as prescribed by the Department of Public Safety. Ignition-interlock vendors must also use the uniform format when sharing data with courts ordering an ignition interlock, with alcohol safety education programs, or with other treatment providers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 542, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 489, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 493, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 478, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 503, § 6, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 447, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2020.